Utah statutes.
75-5-504.   Voidable transactions.
Any loan, sale, or encumbrance on behalf of a principal with his attorney-in-
fact, or with the attorney-in-fact's spouse, agent, or attorney, or any entity
or trust in which the attorney-in-fact has a substantial beneficial interest,
or any transaction involving the attorney-in-fact which is affected by a
substantial conflict of interest, is voidable unless the transaction is
approved by the court after notice to interested persons and others as
directed by the court.
